Alabama, session 2026rs, SB250.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
45 Section 1. Sections 41-9-708, 41-9-710, 41-9-713, and
46 41-9-714, Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as
47 follows:
48 "§41-9-708
49 (a) There is hereby created and established theThe
50 Alabama Indian Affairs Commission, hereinafter called the
51 commission, is created and established. whichThe commission
52 shall be administered under the direction and supervision of
53 the Joint Committee on Administrative Regulations, as provided
54 by Section 41-22-22.
55 (b)(1) The commission shall be composed of at least 11
56 members. All members of the commission must reside in Alabama.
Page 2

members. All members of the commission must reside in Alabama.
SB250 INTRODUCED
57 Members shall include a member of the State Senate, appointed
58 by the Lieutenant Governor,; and a member of the House of
59 Representatives, appointed by the Speaker of the House of
60 Representatives,; sevennine Indian representatives from the
61 sevennine tribes, bands, or groups in the State of Alabama,
62 appointed by the Governor,; one Alabama resident, appointed by
63 the commission; and one member at largeat-large, appointed by
64 the Governor.
65 (2) The Governor shall appoint sevennine Indian members
66 appointed by the Governor shall be appointed from
67 recommendations submitted by each of the sevennine Indian
68 tribes, bands, or groups, principally geographically located
69 as follows: The Poarch Band of Creeks of Escambia County, one
70 member; the Mowa Band of Choctaws of southwest Alabama, one
71 member; the Star Clan of Muscogee Creeks of Pike
72 CountySoutheast Mvskoke Nation, one member; the Echota
73 Cherokees of Alabama, one member; the Cherokees of northeast
74 Alabama, one member; the Cherokees of southeast
75 AlabamaChero-Creek Intratribal Indians, one member; the Piqua
76 Shawnee Tribe of Alabama, one member; the United Cherokee
77 Ani-Yun-Wiya Nation, one member; and the Ma-Chis Lower Creek
78 Indian Tribe of Alabama, one member. Each of the sevennine
79 identified groups shall have one member appointed to the
80 commission.
81 (3) The commission shall appoint one Alabama resident
82 appointed by the commission shall be, who is a member of a
83 federally recognized Indian tribe, band, or group, that isand
84 not a member of any tribe represented on this commission.
Page 3

not a member of any tribe represented on this commission.
SB250 INTRODUCED
85 (4) The Governor shall appoint one member at
86 largeat-large appointed by the Governor, who may be Indian or
87 non-Indian;. provided, however,However, that the majority of
88 the members of the commission shall always be Indian.
89 (5) All above stated tribes, bands, and groups shall be
90 state recognized upon passage of this article. The commission
91 shall have the power tomay recognize additional Indian tribes,
92 bands, or groups. The commission shall adopt appropriate
93 procedure for suchthe recognition process. Any recognized
94 Indian tribe, band, or group shall be entitled to have one
95 representative on the commission who shall be appointed by the
96 Governor for an initial term of three years by the Governor
97 and subject thereafter to the same requirements and privileges
98 as specified in subsections (b) and (c) and any other
99 applicable sectionsthe members described in subdivision (2),
100 and this . Said member shall be granted the same voting powers
101 accorded other members.
102 (c) The commission shall elect a chairmanchair of the
103 commission from among its members. Members serving by virtue
104 of their office within state government shall serve so long as
105 they hold that office. The terms of office for all other
106 members shall be for four years each, except for the initial
107 appointments which shall be as follows: Four members for two
108 years; two members for three years; and two members for four
109 years. The initial term of office for personsindividuals who
110 are granted membership upon the recognition of their tribe,
111 band, or group by the commission shall be as provided in
112 subsectionsubdivision (b)(5). The initial term and all
Page 4

subsectionsubdivision (b)(5). The initial term and all
SB250 INTRODUCED
113 subsequent terms of office of the member representing the
114 Ma-Chis Lower Creek Indian Tribe of Alabama shall be four
115 years. Each member shall serve until his or her successor is
116 appointed. Members shall be eligible for reappointment. Upon
117 the death, disability, resignation, removal, or refusal to
118 serve of any member, the Governor shall appoint a qualified
119 member of that tribe, band, or group to fill the unexpired
120 term of office.
121 (d) The chairmanchair shall submit any written
122 complaint of any tribal body that appoints members to the
123 commission, or any written complaint of any other appointing
124 authority that any commissionermember is negligent in the
125 performance of his or her commission duties to the Governor
126 for review. After reviewing the complaint, if the Governor
127 determines the commissionmember has been negligent, the
128 Governor may remove the commissionermember from the commission
129 and appoint a successor as provided in this section."
130 "§41-9-710
131 (a) It shall be the duty of the commission toThe
132 commission shall:
133 (1) studyStudy, consider, accumulate, compile,
134 assemble, and disseminate information on any aspect of Indian
135 affairs;
136 (2) to investigateInvestigate relief needs of Indians
137 of Alabama and to provide technical assistance in the
138 preparation of plans for the alleviation of such needs;
139 (3) to conferConfer with appropriate officials of
140 local, state, and federal governments and agencies of those
Page 5

local, state, and federal governments and agencies of those
SB250 INTRODUCED
141 concerned with Indian affairs to encourage and implement
142 coordination of applicable resources to meet the needs of
143 Indians in Alabama;
144 (4) to cooperateCooperate with and secure the
145 assistance of the local, state, and federal governments or any
146 agencies thereof in formulating any such programs for Indians
147 in Alabama;, and
148 (5) to coordinateCoordinate such programs for Indians
149 in Alabama with any program federal programs regarding Indian
150 affairs adopted or planned by the federal government to the
151 end so that the Alabama Indian Affairs Commissioncommission
152 securesecures the full benefit of such the programs;
153 (6) provided, however, that such commission is hereby
154 authorized to directly seek and receive from the federal
155 government any grants, funds or other benefits which may be
156 available for Indians; to reviewReview all proposed or pending
157 legislation and amendments to existing state legislation
158 affecting Indians in Alabama; and
159 (7) to conductConduct public hearings on matters
160 relating to Indian affairs.
161 (b) The commission may directly seek and receive from
162 the federal or state government any appropriations, grants,
163 funds, or other benefits which may be available for Indians.
164 (c) The commission shall not be compelled to provide
165 any tribal roles, genealogy, or membership information of its
166 recognized tribes to any membership organization."
167 "§41-9-713
168 The commission shall hire an executive director for the
Page 6

The commission shall hire an executive director for the
SB250 INTRODUCED
169 commission. The commission shall fix the executive director's
170 salary, and the salary shall be limited to the maximum step
171 authorized for pay grade 84 of the personnel Merit System pay
172 plan, as provided by the State Personnel Board under Section
173 36-6-5. The executive director shall be at least 30 years of
174 age and shall have been a citizen and resident of this state
175 for at least five years prior to employment. SuchThe executive
176 director shall serve as secretary of the commission and as
177 chief administrator and executive officer of the commission,
178 having general charge of the work of the commission under its
179 direction,. and The executive director shall hire such other
180 personnel as may be necessary in carrying out the provisions
181 of this article. The executive director shall always serve at
182 the discretion of the commission."
183 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
184 1, 2026.
Page 7